waterfox/browser/locales/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX wV Y 74
SFX wV tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre po:infi
SFX wV croître croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croître po:ppre
SFX wV croitre croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croitre po:ppre
SFX wV croître cru/L'D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wV croître crus/D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wV croître crue/L'D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wV croître crues/D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wV croitre cru/L'D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wV croitre crus/D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wV croitre crue/L'D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wV croitre crues/D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wV croître crois/j'n'q'l'm't' croître po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître croît/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wV croître croissons/n'q'l't' croître po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissez/n'q'l'm' croître po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wV croître croissent/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wV croitre crois/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croit/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'q'l't' croitre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'q'l'm' croitre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wV croitre croissent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wV croître croissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croître po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître croissait/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wV croître croissions/n'q'l't' croître po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissiez/n'q'l'm' croître po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wV croître croissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wV croitre croissais/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croissait/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croissions/n'q'l't' croitre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissiez/n'q'l'm' croitre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wV croitre croissaient/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wV croître crus/j'n'q'l'm't' croître po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître crut/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wV croître crûmes/n'q'l't' croître po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wV croître crûtes/n'q'l'm' croître po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wV croître crurent/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wV croitre crus/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre crut/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wV croitre crûmes/n'q'l't' croitre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wV croitre crûtes/n'q'l'm' croitre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crurent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wV tre trai/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wV tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wV tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wV tre trons/n'q'l't' tre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wV tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wV tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wV tre trais/j'n'q'l'm't' tre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:cond po:3sg
SFX wV tre trions/n'q'l't' tre po:cond po:1pl
SFX wV tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre po:cond po:2pl
SFX wV tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre po:cond po:3pl
SFX wV croître croisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croître po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wV croître croisses/n'q'l'm't' croître po:spre po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croisse/j'n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croisses/n'q'l'm't' croitre po:spre po:2sg
SFX wV croître crusse/j'n'q'l'm't' croître po:simp po:1sg
SFX wV croître crusses/n'q'l'm't' croître po:simp po:2sg
SFX wV croître crût/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:simp po:3sg
SFX wV croître crussions/n'q'l't' croître po:simp po:1pl
SFX wV croître crussiez/n'q'l'm' croître po:simp po:2pl
SFX wV croître crussent/n'q'l'm't's' croître po:simp po:3pl
SFX wV croitre crusse/j'n'q'l'm't' croitre po:simp po:1sg
SFX wV croitre crusses/n'q'l'm't' croitre po:simp po:2sg
SFX wV croitre crût/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:simp po:3sg
SFX wV croitre crussions/n'q'l't' croitre po:simp po:1pl
SFX wV croitre crussiez/n'q'l'm' croitre po:simp po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crussent/n'q'l'm't's' croitre po:simp po:3pl
SFX wV croître crois/n'l'm't' croître po:impe po:2sg
SFX wV croître croissons/n'l't' croître po:impe po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissez/n'l'm' croître po:impe po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crois/n'l'm't' croitre po:impe po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'l't' croitre po:impe po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'l'm' croitre po:impe po:2pl

SFX xA Y 43
SFX xA roire roire/n'q'd'l'm't's' croire po:infi
SFX xA roire royant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croire po:ppre
SFX xA roire ru/L'D'Q' croire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xA roire rus/D'Q' croire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xA roire rue/L'D'Q' croire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xA roire rues/D'Q' croire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xA roire rois/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire roit/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ipre po:3sg
SFX xA roire royons/n'q'l't' croire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xA roire royez/n'q'l'm' croire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xA roire roient/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xA roire royais/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire royait/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xA roire royions/n'q'l't' croire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xA roire royiez/n'q'l'm' croire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xA roire royaient/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xA roire rus/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire rut/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xA roire rûmes/n'q'l't' croire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xA roire rûtes/n'q'l'm' croire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xA roire rurent/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xA roire roirai/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xA roire roiras/n'q'l'm't' croire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xA roire roira/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xA roire roirons/n'q'l't' croire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xA roire roirez/n'q'l'm' croire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xA roire roiront/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xA roire roirais/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire roirait/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:cond po:3sg
SFX xA roire roirions/n'q'l't' croire po:cond po:1pl
SFX xA roire roiriez/n'q'l'm' croire po:cond po:2pl
SFX xA roire roiraient/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:cond po:3pl
SFX xA roire roie/j'n'q'l'm't's' croire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xA roire roies/n'q'l'm't' croire po:spre po:2sg
SFX xA roire russe/j'n'q'l'm't' croire po:simp po:1sg
SFX xA roire russes/n'q'l'm't' croire po:simp po:2sg
SFX xA roire rût/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:simp po:3sg
SFX xA roire russions/n'q'l't' croire po:simp po:1pl
SFX xA roire russiez/n'q'l'm' croire po:simp po:2pl
SFX xA roire russent/n'q'l'm't's' croire po:simp po:3pl
SFX xA roire rois/n'l'm't' croire po:impe po:2sg
SFX xA roire royons/n'l't' croire po:impe po:1pl
SFX xA roire royez/n'l'm' croire po:impe po:2pl
